Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 161.295 is amended to read:
161.295. (1) A person is guilty except  for insanity if, [ as a result of a qualifying mental
disorder] at the time of engaging in  criminal conduct, the person lacks substantial capacity either
to appreciate the criminality of the conduct or to  conform the conduct to the requirements of law ,
and:
(a) But  for a qualifying mental disorder, the person would have had such substantial ca-
pacity;
(b) A mental disorder other than a  qualifying mental disorder is not the primary cause
of the lack of substantial capacity; and
(c) The lack of substantial capacity is not the result of voluntary intoxication  in combi-
nation with a qualifying mental disorder, a mental disorder other than a qualifying  mental
disorder or both.
(2) As used in chapter 743,  Oregon Laws 1971, the term “qualifying mental disorder” does not
include an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal  or otherwise antisocial conduct, nor
does the term include any abnormality constituting solely a personality disorder.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 161.295 by section 1 of this 2025  Act apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2471 (HB 2471-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2471 (HB 2471-A) Page 2